sq_AL.aff
FLAG long
SFX C1 Y 50
SFX C1 em ashë them po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C1 em a them po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C1 em amë them po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C1 em atë them po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C1 em anë them po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C1 jap dhashë jap po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C1 jap dhe jap po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C1 jap dha jap po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C1 jap dhamë jap po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C1 jap dhatë jap po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C1 jap dhanë jap po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C1 jepem dhashë jepem po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C1 jepem dhe jepem po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C1 jepem dha jepem po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C1 jepem dhamë jepem po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C1 jepem dhatë jepem po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C1 jepem dhanë jepem po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C1 ipem opa ipem po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C1 ipem ope ipem po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C1 ipem opi ipem po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C1 ipem opëm ipem po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C1 ipem opët ipem po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C1 ipem opën ipem po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C1 bie rashë bie po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C1 bie re bie po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C1 bie ra bie po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C1 bie ramë bie po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C1 bie ratë bie po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C1 bie ranë bie po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C1 shoh pashë shoh po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C1 shoh pe shoh po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C1 shoh pa shoh po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C1 shoh pamë shoh po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C1 shoh patë shoh po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C1 shoh panë shoh po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C1 edh odha edh po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C1 edh odhe edh po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C1 edh odhi edh po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C1 edh odhëm edh po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C1 edh odhët edh po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C1 edh odhën edh po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C1 hem ajta uhem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C1 hem ajte uhem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C1 hem ajt uhem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C1 hem ajtëm uhem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C1 hem ajtët uhem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C1 hem ajtën uhem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C1 j më j po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C1 j të j po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C1 j në j po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3

SFX C2 Y 48
SFX C2 ej ye ej po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 ej yem ej po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C2 ej yet ej po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C2 ej yen ej po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 em a em po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C2 em i betem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 em ëm em po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C2 em ët em po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C2 em ën em po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 n jti [aeo]n po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 n jtën [aeo]n po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 arr or arr po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 het 0 dahet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 ehet ye ehet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 ehet yen ehet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 bihet ra bihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 bihet ranë bihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 ihet e blihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 ihet enë blihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 lihet jeti flihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 lihet jetën flihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 ihet ur pihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 ihet unë pihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 litet ol litet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 litet olën litet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 et au ngjet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 et anë ngjet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 ihet oh njihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 ihet ohën njihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 het t dihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 het t [^ë][gr]rihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 het tën [dr]ihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 shihet pa shihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 shihet panë shihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 het e zihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 ihet jenë zihet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 irret or irret po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 irret orën irret po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 het a uhet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 het an uhet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 het e yhet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 het en yhet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 idhet odh idhet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 izet ez izet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 jerr or jerr po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 ohet ua ohet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C2 ohet uan ohet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C2 s 0 s po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3

SFX C3 Y 12
SFX C3 em 0 em po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C3 j 0 [ae]j po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C3 jerdh ordh jerdh po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C3 jerg orgj jerg po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C3 het jt [ae]het po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C3 het jtën [ae]het po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C3 het ajt [lrv]uhet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C3 het ajtën [lrv]uhet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C3 ihet u vihet po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C3 ihet unë vihet po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C3 uhet a huhet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C3 uhet anë huhet po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3

SFX C4 Y 18
SFX C4 em ë em po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX C4 em a em po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX C4 em ët em po:noun po:asnj
SFX C4 em i em po:noun po:asnj
SFX C4 j i oj po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C4 oj uam oj po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C4 oj uat oj po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C4 oj uan oj po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C4 nj i onj po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C4 nj va onj po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C4 nj ve onj po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C4 onj uam onj po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C4 onj uat onj po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C4 onj uan onj po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C4 j m [ae]j po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C4 j t [ae]j po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C4 j n [ae]j po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C4 het në [aeëiy]het po:verb is:j_dfkt is:pl3

SFX C5 Y 12
SFX C5 j va j po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C5 j ve j po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C5 s va s po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C5 s ve s po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C5 s u s po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C5 s më s po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C5 s të s po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C5 s në s po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C5 et 0 et po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C5 et ën et po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C5 hem va [aeioy]hem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C5 hem ve [aeioy]hem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg2

SFX C6 Y 1
SFX C6 0 ën [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3

SFX C7 Y 1
SFX C7 0 i [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3

SFX C8 Y 23
SFX C8 0 in n po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C8 0 më i po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C8 0 në i po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3
SFX C8 0 t j po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C8 edh idhesha dh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX C8 edh idheshe dh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX C8 edh idheshim dh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX C8 edh idheshit dh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX C8 hem eva fyhem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C8 hem eve fyhem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C8 yhem eva [hjlnqr]yhem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C8 yhem eve [hjlnqr]yhem po:verb is:j_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C8 jam isha jam po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX C8 jam ishe jam po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX C8 jam ishte jam po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX C8 jam ishim jam po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX C8 jam ishit jam po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX C8 jam ishin jam po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX C8 jam qeshë jam po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg1
SFX C8 jam qe jam po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg2
SFX C8 jam qemë jam po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl1
SFX C8 jam qetë jam po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl2
SFX C8 jam qenë jam po:verb is:v_dfkt is:pl3

SFX C9 Y 5
SFX C9 0 u [^d][ghik] po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C9 j u [^ë]j po:verb is:v_dfkt is:sg3
SFX C9 edh idhej dh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX C9 edh idhesh dh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX C9 edh idheshin dh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3

SFX D0 Y 4
SFX D0 0 esha [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D0 0 eshe [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D0 0 eshim [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D0 0 eshit [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
